Louisiana, session 2026, HB176.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 8:659(C) and (D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§659. Permission to move remains
* * *
C.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection A of this Section, if the
decedent dies in a manner described by 10 U.S.C. 1481(a)(1) through (8) while
serving in any branch of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Reserve
Forces, or the National Guard, and the decedent executed a United States Department
of Defense Record of Emergency Data, known as a DD Form 93, or its successor
form, the right to control interment for the decedent shall devolve upon the Person
Authorized to Direct Disposition, or the PADD, as indicated on the DD Form 93, or
its successor form.
(2) There shall be no liability for a cemetery authority, funeral establishment,
funeral director, crematory authority, or their employees or agents to whom a copy
of a DD Form 93 is presented, purportedly executed by the decedent for conduction
of the interment or other disposition of the decedent's remains, pursuant to the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-45 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 176
instructions of the PADD as indicated on the DD Form 93, or for relying on the
representation of the PADD that the decedent dies in a manner described in
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
D.(1) In the event that the decedent had made multiple notarial testaments
or notarized declarations pursuant to Subsection A of this Section, the testament or
declaration, whichever is dated last, shall control interment of the decedent's
remains.
(2) In the event that the decedent had made one or more notarial testaments
or notarized declarations pursuant to Subsection A of this Section, and the decedent
executed a DD Form 93 and died in the manner described in Subsection C of this
Section, the testament, declaration, or the DD Form 93, whichever is dated last, shall
control interment of the decedent's remains.